apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_np.ca.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="iso-8859-1"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="detnt"/>
    <sdef n="predet"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="nn"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="aa"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
    <sdef n="web"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
  </sdefs>


 <pardefs>

<!--Paradigmes de números i signes puntuació -->

<pardef n="guionet">
    
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="coma">
    
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>,</l>
         <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
    
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
    
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

     <pardef n="separ">
    
      <e>
        <re>[¿¡]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
    
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
    
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="Barcelona__np">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Afganistan__np">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Estats_Units__np">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Bahames__np">
      
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Marc__np">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Maria__np">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 </pardefs>

<e lm="Açores"><i>Açores</i><par n="Bahames__np"/></e>
<e lm="Alemanya"><i>Alemanya</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Alhucemas"><i>Alhucemas</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Amèrica Central"><i>Amèrica<b/>Central</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Andorra"><i>Andorra</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ankara"><i>Ankara</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Antilles Holandeses"><i>Antilles<b/>Holandeses</i><par n="Bahames__np"/></e>
<e lm="Apalatxes"><i>Apalatxes</i><par n="Estats_Units__np"/></e>
<e lm="Argentina"><i>Argentina</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Asunción"><i>Asunción</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Austin"><i>Austin</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bahames"><i>Bahames</i><par n="Bahames__np"/></e>
<e lm="Balcans"><i>Balcans</i><par n="Estats_Units__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bangkok"><i>Bangkok</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Barbados"><i>Barbados</i><par n="Bahames__np"/></e>
<e lm="Barcelona"><i>Barcelona</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Belgrad"><i>Belgrad</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bermudes"><i>Bermudes</i><par n="Bahames__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bernoulli"><i>Bernoulli</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Birmània"><i>Birmània</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bridgetown"><i>Bridgetown</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Budapest"><i>Budapest</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Canadà"><i>Canadà</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Canàries"><i>Canàries</i><par n="Bahames__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ceuta"><i>Ceuta</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Congo"><i>Congo</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Cuba"><i>Cuba</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Edimburg"><i>Edimburg</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Emirats Àrabs Units"><i>Emirats<b/>Àrabs<b/>Units</i><par n="Estats_Units__np"/></e>
<e lm="Eslovàquia"><i>Eslovàquia</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Estats Units"><i>Estats Units</i><par n="Estats_Units__np"/></e>
<e lm="Estats Units d'Amèrica"><i>Estats<b/>Units<b/>d'Amèrica</i><par n="Estats_Units__np"/></e>
<e lm="EUA"><i>EUA</i><par n="Estats_Units__np"/></e>
<e lm="Formosa"><i>Formosa</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Frankfurt"><i>Frankfurt</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Guadalupe"><i>Guadalupe</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Haití"><i>Haití</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hongria"><i>Hongria</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Iemen"><i>Iemen</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Illes Anglonormandes"><i>Illes<b/>Anglonormandes</i><par n="Bahames__np"/></e>
<e lm="Illes Balears"><i>Illes<b/>Balears</i><par n="Bahames__np"/></e>
<e lm="Illes Britàniques"><i>Illes<b/>Britàniques</i><par n="Bahames__np"/></e>
<e lm="Illes Caiman"><i>Illes<b/>Caiman</i><par n="Bahames__np"/></e>
<e lm="Illes Canàries"><i>Illes<b/>Canàries</i><par n="Bahames__np"/></e>
<e lm="Illes Comores"><i>Illes<b/>Comores</i><par n="Bahames__np"/></e>
<e lm="Illes Cook"><i>Illes<b/>Cook</i><par n="Bahames__np"/></e>
<e lm="Illes del Canal"><i>Illes<b/>del<b/>Canal</i><par n="Bahames__np"/></e>
<e lm="Illes Galàpagos"><i>Illes<b/>Galàpagos</i><par n="Bahames__np"/></e>
<e lm="Illes Malvines"><i>Illes<b/>Malvines</i><par n="Bahames__np"/></e>
<e lm="Illes Marshall"><i>Illes<b/>Marshall</i><par n="Bahames__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jamaica"><i>Jamaica</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Júpiter"><i>Júpiter</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kuwait"><i>Kuwait</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Lima"><i>Lima</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Madagascar"><i>Madagascar</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Magúncia"><i>Magúncia</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Maldives"><i>Maldives</i><par n="Bahames__np"/></e>
<e lm="Mauritània"><i>Mauritània</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Milà"><i>Milà</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Montpeller"><i>Montpeller</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Nairobi"><i>Nairobi</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Níger"><i>Níger</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Nova Delhi"><i>Nova<b/>Delhi</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Oregon"><i>Oregon</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Països Baixos"><i>Països<b/>Baixos</i><par n="Estats_Units__np"/></e>
<e lm="Paraguai"><i>Paraguai</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Pennsilvània"><i>Pennsilvània</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Puerto Rico"><i>Puerto<b/>Rico</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Roma"><i>Roma</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Samoa"><i>Samoa</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Filipines"><i>Filipines</i><par n="Bahames__np"/></e>
<e lm="Seychelles"><i>Seychelles</i><par n="Bahames__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sud-àfrica"><i>Sud-àfrica</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Tenerife"><i>Tenerife</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Turquia"><i>Turquia</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Venus"><i>Venus</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Victòria"><i>Victòria</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Zanzíbar"><i>Zanzíbar</i><par n="Afganistan__np"/></e>
<e lm="Aitor"><i>Aitor</i><par n="Marc__np"/></e>
<e lm="Alexandra"><i>Alexandra</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Alex"><i>Alex</i><par n="Marc__np"/></e>
<e lm="Andrea"><i>Andrea</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Àngel"><i>Àngel</i><par n="Marc__np"/></e>
<e lm="Antònia"><i>Antònia</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Arnald"><i>Arnald</i><par n="Marc__np"/></e>
<e lm="Baterich"><i>Baterich</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Benedict"><i>Benedict</i><par n="Marc__np"/></e>
<e lm="Candela "><i>Candela </i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Cecil"><i>Cecil</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Christopher"><i>Christopher</i><par n="Marc__np"/></e>
<e lm="Collys"><i>Collys</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Dionisia"><i>Dionisia</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Edmond"><i>Edmond</i><par n="Marc__np"/></e>
<e lm="Elizabeth"><i>Elizabeth</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Esperaunce"><i>Esperaunce</i><par n="Marc__np"/></e>
<e lm="Esther"><i>Esther</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Frances"><i>Frances</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Francis"><i>Francis</i><par n="Marc__np"/></e>
<e lm="Giles"><i>Giles</i><par n="Marc__np"/></e>
<e lm="Henry"><i>Henry</i><par n="Marc__np"/></e>
<e lm="Inès"><i>Inès</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ingham"><i>Ingham</i><par n="Marc__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jaume"><i>Jaume</i><par n="Marc__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jeanne"><i>Jeanne</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Joel"><i>Joel</i><par n="Marc__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kateryn"><i>Kateryn</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Laurence"><i>Laurence</i><par n="Marc__np"/></e>
<e lm="Llúcia"><i>Llúcia</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Luke"><i>Luke</i><par n="Marc__np"/></e>
<e lm="Margalida"><i>Margalida</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Maria del Mar"><i>Maria del Mar</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Marion"><i>Marion</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Maurice"><i>Maurice</i><par n="Marc__np"/></e>
<e lm="Mildred"><i>Mildred</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Neus"><i>Neus</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Nichol"><i>Nichol</i><par n="Marc__np"/></e>
<e lm="Owner"><i>Owner</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Pere"><i>Pere</i><par n="Marc__np"/></e>
<e lm="Raffe"><i>Raffe</i><par n="Marc__np"/></e>
<e lm="Raulin"><i>Raulin</i><par n="Marc__np"/></e>
<e lm="Roger"><i>Roger</i><par n="Marc__np"/></e>
<e lm="Rose"><i>Rose</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sílvia"><i>Sílvia</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Simon"><i>Simon</i><par n="Marc__np"/></e>
<e lm="Tània"><i>Tània</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Tomàs"><i>Tomàs</i><par n="Marc__np"/></e>
<e lm="Xavier"><i>Xavier</i><par n="Marc__np"/></e>
<e lm="Yaiza"><i>Yaiza</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
      <e>
        <par n="separa"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="numeros"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="coma"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="paresq"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="pardret"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="separ"/>
      </e>
   <e>
        <par n="guionet"/>
      </e>
